Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3005
Practice of podiatry, defined.

Practice of podiatry means the diagnosis or medical, physical, or surgical treatment of the ailments of the human foot, ankle, and related governing structures except (1) the amputation of the forefoot, (2) the general medical treatment of any systemic disease causing manifestations in the foot, and (3) the administration of anesthetics other than local.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1027.